District of Columbia statutes.
21-2072

Enlargement or limitation of powers of conservator.

Subject to the restrictions in section 21-2055(c) , the court may confer on a conservator, at the time of appointment or later, in addition to the powers conferred by sections 21-2070 and 21-2071 , any power that the court itself could exercise under section 21-2055(b)(2) . The court, at the time of appointment or later, may limit the powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by sections 21-2070 and 21-2071 or previously conferred by the court and may at any time remove or modify any limitations. If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by section 21-2070 or section 21-2071 , or specifies, as provided in section 21-2066(a) , that title to some but not all assets of the protected individual vest in the conservator, the limitation or specification of assets subject to the conservatorship shall be endorsed upon the letters of appointment.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
This section is referenced in § 21-2069 and § 21-2070.
1981 Ed., § 21-2072.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-325 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).